Wisconsin, session 2025, AB570.
do enact as follows:AB570,11Section 1. 115.7915 (4m) (em) of the statutes is created to read:AB570,2,72115.7915 (4m) (em) Notwithstanding pars. (a), (cm), and (e), if a child 3attending a private school under the scholarship program under this section 4withdraws from the private school under this section during a school year and 5subsequently enrolls in a school district, the department shall pay the remainder of 6the scholarship amount due to the private school for the child for that school year to 7the school district in which the child enrolls.AB570,28Section 2. 118.40 (2r) (e) 3n. of the statutes is created to read:AB570,2,149118.40 (2r) (e) 3n. Notwithstanding subd. 2p., if a pupil attending a charter 10school established by or under a contract with an entity under par. (b) 1. for whom 11a payment is due under this paragraph withdraws from the charter school during 12the school year and subsequently enrolls in a school district, the department shall 13pay any remaining amount due to the operator of the charter school for that pupil 14for that school year to the school district in which the pupil enrolls.AB570,315Section 3. 118.40 (2x) (e) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB570,3,216118.40 (2x) (e) 3. Notwithstanding subd. 1m., if a pupil attending a charter 17school established under this subsection for whom a payment is due under this 18paragraph withdraws from the charter school during the school year and 19subsequently enrolls in a school district, the department shall pay any remaining 1amount due to the operator of the charter school for that pupil for that school year to 2the school district in which the pupil enrolls.AB570,43Section 4. 118.60 (4) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB570,3,84118.60 (4) (d) Notwithstanding par. (bg), if a pupil attending a private school 5under this section for whom a payment is due under this subsection withdraws from 6the private school during the school year and subsequently enrolls in a school 7district, the department shall pay any remaining amount due to the private school 8for that pupil for that school year to the school district in which the pupil enrolls.AB570,59Section 5. 119.23 (4) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB570,3,1410119.23 (4) (d) Notwithstanding par. (bg), if a pupil attending a private school 11under this section for whom a payment is due under this subsection withdraws from 12the private school during the school year and subsequently enrolls in a school 13district, the department shall pay any remaining amount due to the private school 14for that pupil for that school year to the school district in which the pupil enrolls.AB570,615Section 6. Effective date.AB570,3,1616(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2026.AB570,3,1717